Utah statutes.
67-4-1.   Duties.

(1)  The state treasurer shall:

(a)  receive and maintain custody of all state funds;

(b)  unless otherwise provided by law, invest all funds delivered into the state treasurer's custody according to the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(c)  pay warrants drawn by the Division of Finance as they are presented;

(d)  return each redeemed warrant to the Division of Finance for purposes of reconciliation, post-audit, and verification;

(e)  ensure that state warrants not presented to the state treasurer for payment within one year from the date of issue, or a shorter period if required by federal regulation or contract, are canceled and credited to the proper fund;

(f)  account for all money received and disbursed;

(g)  keep separate account of the different funds;

(h)  keep safe all bonds, warrants, and securities delivered into his custody;

(i)  at the request of either house of the Legislature, or of any legislative committee, give information in writing as to the condition of the treasury, or upon any subject relating to the duties of his office;

(j)  keep the books open at all times for the inspection by the governor, the state auditor, or any member of the Legislature, or any committee appointed to examine them by either house of the Legislature;

(k)  authenticate and validate documents when necessary;

(l)  adopt a seal and file a description and an impression of it with the Division of Archives; and

(m)  discharge the duties of a member of all official boards of which he is or may be made a member by the Constitution or laws of Utah.

(2)  When necessary to perform his duties, the state treasurer may inspect the books, papers, and accounts of any state entity.

